Nebraska, session 109, LB692.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB692 LB692
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-3403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3403 (1) Except as provided in sections 79-3404 and 79-3405, a
school district's property tax request for any year shall not exceed the
school district's property tax request authority.
(2) The department shall calculate each school district's property
tax request authority on an annual basis as follows:
(a) The school district's property tax request from the prior year
minus the amount, if any, the property tax request exceeded the school
district's property tax request authority in the prior year pursuant to
section 79-3405 shall be added to the non-property-tax revenue from the
prior year minus any investment income from special building funds from
the prior year, and the total shall be increased by the school district's
base growth percentage; and
(b) The amount determined under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
shall then be decreased by the amount of total non-property-tax revenue
for the current year and adjusted for any known or documented errors in
documentation received by the department from the school district. In
determining the total non-property-tax revenue for the current year, any
category of non-property-tax revenue for which there is insufficient data
as of June 1 to make an accurate determination shall be deemed to be
equal to the prior year's amount.
(3) The department shall certify the amount determined for each
school district under this section to the school board of such school
district. Such certified amount shall be the school district's property
tax request authority.
Sec. 2. Section 79-3406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3406 A school district may choose not to increase its property
tax request by the full amount allowed by the school district's property
tax request authority in a particular year. In such cases, the school
-2-

LB692 LB692
2025 2025
district may carry forward to future years the amount of unused property
tax request authority, excluding any increases to property tax request
authority resulting from increases of the school district's base growth
percentage pursuant to section 79-3405. The department shall calculate
each school district's unused property tax request authority and shall
submit an accounting of such amount to the school board of the school
district. Such unused property tax request authority may then be used in
later years for increases in the school district's property tax request.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-3403 and 79-3406, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-